third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY оаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъғӣӯқҳҷАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁҒӢӮҚҲҶ
FLAG num
SFX 1 N 7
SFX 1 0 ад .
SFX 1 0 адам .
SFX 1 0 адат .
SFX 1 0 адатон .
SFX 1 0 адаш .
SFX 1 0 адашон .
SFX 1 0 аду .

SFX 2 N 2
SFX 2 0 ам .
SFX 2 0 аму .

SFX 3 N 4
SFX 3 0 амон .
SFX 3 0 амонанд .
SFX 3 0 амонро .
SFX 3 0 амону .

SFX 4 N 2
SFX 4 0 анд .
SFX 4 0 анду .

SFX 5 N 4
SFX 5 0 ат .
SFX 5 0 атро .
SFX 5 0 атрову .
SFX 5 0 ату .

SFX 6 N 5
SFX 6 0 атон .
SFX 6 0 атонанд .
SFX 6 0 атонро .
SFX 6 0 атонрову .
SFX 6 0 атону .

SFX 7 N 5
SFX 7 0 аш .
SFX 7 0 ашро .
SFX 7 0 ашрову .
SFX 7 0 ашрост .
SFX 7 0 ашу .

SFX 8 N 4
SFX 8 0 ашон .
SFX 8 0 ашонро .
SFX 8 0 ашону .
SFX 8 0 ашонрову .
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 ву .

SFX 10 N 2
SFX 10 0 ед .
SFX 10 0 еду .

SFX 11 N 2
SFX 11 0 ем .
SFX 11 0 ему .

SFX 12 N 2
SFX 12 0 етон .
SFX 12 0 етону .

SFX 14 N 4
SFX 14 0 ро .
SFX 14 0 рову .
SFX 14 0 рост .
SFX 14 0 рою .

SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 у .

SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 ю .

SFX 17 N 7
SFX 17 0 яд .
SFX 17 0 ядам .
SFX 17 0 ядат .
SFX 17 0 ядатон .
SFX 17 0 ядаш .
SFX 17 0 ядашон .
SFX 17 0 яду .

SFX 18 N 2
SFX 18 0 ям .
SFX 18 0 яму .

SFX 19 N 2
SFX 19 0 ямон .
SFX 19 0 ямонро .

SFX 20 N 2
SFX 20 0 янд .
SFX 20 0 янду .

SFX 21 N 3
SFX 21 0 ят .
SFX 21 0 ятро .
SFX 21 0 яту .

SFX 22 N 3
SFX 22 0 ятон .
SFX 22 0 ятонанд .
SFX 22 0 ятонро .

SFX 23 N 3
SFX 23 0 яш .
SFX 23 0 яшро .
SFX 23 0 яшу .

SFX 24 N 3
SFX 24 0 яшон .
SFX 24 0 яшонро .
SFX 24 0 яшонрову .

SFX 25 N 37
SFX 25 0 ҳо .
SFX 25 0 ҳову .
SFX 25 0 ҳоед .
SFX 25 0 ҳоем .
SFX 25 0 ҳоему .
SFX 25 0 ҳои .
SFX 25 0 ҳоро .
SFX 25 0 ҳорову .
SFX 25 0 ҳост .
SFX 25 0 ҳостам .
SFX 25 0 ҳосту .
SFX 25 0 ҳою .
SFX 25 0 ҳоям .
SFX 25 0 ҳоямон .
SFX 25 0 ҳоямонро .
SFX 25 0 ҳоямро .
SFX 25 0 ҳояму .
SFX 25 0 ҳоянд .
SFX 25 0 ҳоянду .
SFX 25 0 ҳоят .
SFX 25 0 ҳоятон .
SFX 25 0 ҳоятонро .
SFX 25 0 ҳоятро .
SFX 25 0 ҳояту .
SFX 25 0 ҳояш .
SFX 25 0 ҳояшон .
SFX 25 0 ҳояшонро .
SFX 25 0 ҳояшонрову .
SFX 25 0 ҳояшону .
SFX 25 0 ҳояшро .
SFX 25 0 ҳоӣ .
SFX 25 0 ҳое .
SFX 25 0 ҳоеанд .
SFX 25 0 ҳоеву .
SFX 25 0 ҳоеро .
SFX 25 0 ҳоест .
SFX 25 0 ҳостӣ .

SFX 27 N 14
SFX 27 0 вон .
SFX 27 0 вонамон .
SFX 27 0 вонанд .
SFX 27 0 вонат .
SFX 27 0 вонаш .
SFX 27 0 вонашон .
SFX 27 0 вонашро .
SFX 27 0 вони .
SFX 27 0 вонро .
SFX 27 0 вону .
SFX 27 0 воне .
SFX 27 0 вонеанд .
SFX 27 0 вонеи .
SFX 27 0 вонест .

SFX 28 N 23
SFX 28 0 гон .
SFX 28 0 гонам .
SFX 28 0 гонамон .
SFX 28 0 гонамонро .
SFX 28 0 гонамро .
SFX 28 0 гонанд .
SFX 28 0 гонанду .
SFX 28 0 гонат .
SFX 28 0 гонатон .
SFX 28 0 гонатро .
SFX 28 0 гонаш .
SFX 28 0 гонашон .
SFX 28 0 гонашонро .
SFX 28 0 гонашро .
SFX 28 0 гонед .
SFX 28 0 гонем .
SFX 28 0 гонему .
SFX 28 0 гони .
SFX 28 0 гонро .
SFX 28 0 гону .
SFX 28 0 гоне .
SFX 28 0 гонеро .
SFX 28 0 гонест .

SFX 29 N 15
SFX 29 0 е .
SFX 29 0 еам .
SFX 29 0 еанд .
SFX 29 0 еаш .
SFX 29 0 еашон .
SFX 29 0 еашонро .
SFX 29 0 еашро .
SFX 29 0 еву .
SFX 29 0 еи .
SFX 29 0 еро .
SFX 29 0 ерову .
SFX 29 0 ерост .
SFX 29 0 ест .
SFX 29 0 есту .
SFX 29 0 ею .

SFX 30 N 24
SFX 30 0 ён .
SFX 30 0 ёнад .
SFX 30 0 ёнам .
SFX 30 0 ёнамон .
SFX 30 0 ёнамонро .
SFX 30 0 ёнанд .
SFX 30 0 ёнат .
SFX 30 0 ёнатон .
SFX 30 0 ёнатонро .
SFX 30 0 ёнатро .
SFX 30 0 ёнаш .
SFX 30 0 ёнашон .
SFX 30 0 ёнашонро .
SFX 30 0 ёнашро .
SFX 30 0 ёнед .
SFX 30 0 ёнедаш .
SFX 30 0 ёнем .
SFX 30 0 ёнему .
SFX 30 0 ёни .
SFX 30 0 ёнро .
SFX 30 0 ёну .
SFX 30 0 ёне .
SFX 30 0 ёнеро .
SFX 30 0 ёнест .

SFX 31 N 64
SFX 31 0 он .
SFX 31 0 онад .
SFX 31 0 онадам .
SFX 31 0 онадат .
SFX 31 0 онадатон .
SFX 31 0 онадаш .
SFX 31 0 онаду .
SFX 31 0 онам .
SFX 31 0 онамаш .
SFX 31 0 онамон .
SFX 31 0 онамонро .
SFX 31 0 онамро .
SFX 31 0 онаму .
SFX 31 0 онанд .
SFX 31 0 онандамон .
SFX 31 0 онандашон .
SFX 31 0 онанду .
SFX 31 0 онаст .
SFX 31 0 онат .
SFX 31 0 онатон .
SFX 31 0 онатонро .
SFX 31 0 онатону .
SFX 31 0 онатро .
SFX 31 0 онату .
SFX 31 0 онаш .
SFX 31 0 онашон .
SFX 31 0 онашонро .
SFX 31 0 онашону .
SFX 31 0 онашро .
SFX 31 0 онед .
SFX 31 0 онедаш .
SFX 31 0 онеду .
SFX 31 0 онем .
SFX 31 0 онемаш .
SFX 31 0 онему .
SFX 31 0 они .
SFX 31 0 онро .
SFX 31 0 онрову .
SFX 31 0 онрост .
SFX 31 0 ону .
SFX 31 0 онӣ .
SFX 31 0 ониам .
SFX 31 0 онианд .
SFX 31 0 ониатон .
SFX 31 0 ониаш .
SFX 31 0 ониашон .
SFX 31 0 ониашонро .
SFX 31 0 ониашро .
SFX 31 0 ониву .
SFX 31 0 онии .
SFX 31 0 ониро .
SFX 31 0 онист .
SFX 31 0 онию .
SFX 31 0 ониям .
SFX 31 0 оният .
SFX 31 0 ониятро .
SFX 31 0 онияту .
SFX 31 0 онияш .
SFX 31 0 онияшон .
SFX 31 0 оне .
SFX 31 0 онеанд .
SFX 31 0 оневу .
SFX 31 0 онеро .
SFX 31 0 онест .

SFX 32 N 4
SFX 32 0 ҳак .
SFX 32 0 ҳакам .
SFX 32 0 ҳаки .
SFX 32 0 ҳакак .

SFX 33 N 25
SFX 33 0 ҷон .
SFX 33 0 ҷонам .
SFX 33 0 ҷонамон .
SFX 33 0 ҷонамонро .
SFX 33 0 ҷонамро .
SFX 33 0 ҷонаму .
SFX 33 0 ҷонат .
SFX 33 0 ҷонаш .
SFX 33 0 ҷонашон .
SFX 33 0 ҷонашро .
SFX 33 0 ҷони .
SFX 33 0 ҷонро .
SFX 33 0 ҷону .
SFX 33 0 ҷонӣ .
SFX 33 0 ҷонакам .
SFX 33 0 ҷонакаш .
SFX 33 0 ҷониён .
SFX 33 0 ҷонов .
SFX 33 0 ҷонови .
SFX 33 0 ҷоновро .
SFX 33 0 ҷоновҳо .
SFX 33 0 ҷонова .
SFX 33 0 ҷоноваро .
SFX 33 0 ҷонович .
SFX 33 0 ҷоновна .

SFX 34 N 4
SFX 34 0 ҷот .
SFX 34 0 ҷоти .
SFX 34 0 ҷотро .
SFX 34 0 ҷоту .

SFX 35 N 31
SFX 35 0 а .
SFX 35 0 аам .
SFX 35 0 аамон .
SFX 35 0 аамонро .
SFX 35 0 аамро .
SFX 35 0 ааму .
SFX 35 0 аанд .
SFX 35 0 аандат .
SFX 35 0 аанду .
SFX 35 0 ааст .
SFX 35 0 аасту .
SFX 35 0 аат .
SFX 35 0 аатон .
SFX 35 0 аатонро .
SFX 35 0 аатро .
SFX 35 0 ааш .
SFX 35 0 аашон .
SFX 35 0 аашонро .
SFX 35 0 аашро .
SFX 35 0 аву .
SFX 35 0 аед .
SFX 35 0 аеду .
SFX 35 0 аем .
SFX 35 0 аемаш .
SFX 35 0 аему .
SFX 35 0 аи .
SFX 35 0 аро .
SFX 35 0 аст .
SFX 35 0 асту .
SFX 35 0 аю .
SFX 35 0 аям .

SFX 36 N 21
SFX 36 0 аҳо .
SFX 36 0 аҳову .
SFX 36 0 аҳои .
SFX 36 0 аҳоро .
SFX 36 0 аҳост .
SFX 36 0 аҳою .
SFX 36 0 аҳоям .
SFX 36 0 аҳоямро .
SFX 36 0 аҳоянд .
SFX 36 0 аҳоят .
SFX 36 0 аҳоятон .
SFX 36 0 аҳоятонро .
SFX 36 0 аҳоятро .
SFX 36 0 аҳояш .
SFX 36 0 аҳояшон .
SFX 36 0 аҳояшонро .
SFX 36 0 аҳояшро .
SFX 36 0 аҳое .
SFX 36 0 аҳоеанд .
SFX 36 0 аҳоеро .
SFX 36 0 аҳоест .

SFX 37 N 2
SFX 37 0 аҷон .
SFX 37 0 аҷонам .

SFX 38 N 9
SFX 38 0 аҷот .
SFX 38 0 аҷоти .
SFX 38 0 аҷотро .
SFX 38 0 аҷоту .
SFX 38 0 аҷотҳо .
SFX 38 0 аҷотҳову .
SFX 38 0 аҷотҳои .
SFX 38 0 аҷотҳоро .
SFX 38 0 аҷоте .

SFX 39 N 3
SFX 39 0 аӣ .
SFX 39 0 аиву .
SFX 39 0 аию .

SFX 40 N 8
SFX 40 0 авӣ .
SFX 40 0 авиаш .
SFX 40 0 авиву .
SFX 40 0 авии .
SFX 40 0 авиро .
SFX 40 0 авию .
SFX 40 0 авиянд .
SFX 40 0 авие .

SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 авар .

SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 0 авор .

SFX 43 N 31
SFX 43 0 агӣ .
SFX 43 0 агиам .
SFX 43 0 агиамон .
SFX 43 0 агиамонро .
SFX 43 0 агиамро .
SFX 43 0 агианд .
SFX 43 0 агиат .
SFX 43 0 агиатон .
SFX 43 0 агиатонро .
SFX 43 0 агиатро .
SFX 43 0 агиаш .
SFX 43 0 агиашон .
SFX 43 0 агиашонро .
SFX 43 0 агиашро .
SFX 43 0 агиву .
SFX 43 0 агиед .
SFX 43 0 агием .
SFX 43 0 агии .
SFX 43 0 агиро .
SFX 43 0 агист .
SFX 43 0 агистанд .
SFX 43 0 агистед .
SFX 43 0 агистем .
SFX 43 0 агисту .
SFX 43 0 агию .
SFX 43 0 агиям .
SFX 43 0 агият .
SFX 43 0 агиятро .
SFX 43 0 агияш .
SFX 43 0 агияшон .
SFX 43 0 агияшро .

SFX 44 N 9
SFX 44 0 агар .
SFX 44 0 агари .
SFX 44 0 агарҳо .
SFX 44 0 агарӣ .
SFX 44 0 агарии .
SFX 44 0 агаре .
SFX 44 0 агарест .
SFX 44 0 агарон .
SFX 44 0 агарона .

SFX 45 N 7
SFX 45 0 агиҳо .
SFX 45 0 агиҳои .
SFX 45 0 агиҳост .
SFX 45 0 агиҳою .
SFX 45 0 агиҳоям .
SFX 45 0 агиҳоямро .
SFX 45 0 агиҳояшон .

SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 0 агиҳое .

SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 агие .

SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 0 агистӣ .

SFX 49 N 20
SFX 49 0 агон .
SFX 49 0 агонам .
SFX 49 0 агонамон .
SFX 49 0 агонамонро .
SFX 49 0 агонанд .
SFX 49 0 агонат .
SFX 49 0 агонатон .
SFX 49 0 агонатонро .
SFX 49 0 агонатро .
SFX 49 0 агонаш .
SFX 49 0 агонашон .
SFX 49 0 агонашонро .
SFX 49 0 агонашро .
SFX 49 0 агонем .
SFX 49 0 агони .
SFX 49 0 агонро .
SFX 49 0 агону .
SFX 49 0 агонӣ .
SFX 49 0 агонанд .
SFX 49 0 агоне .
