third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
адвия/34,9,859
бағайр/5,859
бача/32,25,33,2,857,5,6,7,140,9,223,244,28,262,266,302,305,29,859,14,787,16,822,826,827
бемавқе/9,859
бех/25,852,2,5,7,8,29,859,627,14,15
биёзмо/10,11,17
бикаш/852,1,2,4,103,842,10,11,366,369,31,15
бинвоз/1,7,10
бинмо/852,9,10,11,30,859,16,17,18,20
бино/25,852,2,9,229,29,30,859,402,855,853,474,863,14,846,860,742,752,16,18,19,20,23
биомӯз/852,1,2,4,10,844,11,31
бозу/25,27,9,29,859,14,846,21,23
вола/9,859,14,16
газо/17,831
гирдбод/35,2,195,29,11,859,552,696,15
гузар/25,852,1,2,3,4,104,112,115,5,6,7,224,254,255,257,258,29,10,11,12,859,853,474,475,580,602,31,636,637,649,651,655,661,662,663,665,669,671,14,15
гулбӯ/30,859,21
гуногунрафтор/3
даҳшатзад/35,43
дараҷа/25,7,8,155,9,223,29,859,14,16
дарбанд/25,852,2,29,10,859,853,31
дарзан/1,2,4
даро/852,10,11,853,382,862,16,17,18,20,831
дастовард/25,35,94,29,859,14,15
димоғошуфта/28
дунё/25,852,3,5,7,155,9,29,10,11,859,402,409,862,863,14,846,737,860,16,18,20,21,23,24
дунёхӯрд/49
дуогӯ/852,29,11,30,859,855,16,18,22
дучарх/35,36
ёри/25,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,9,229,29,859,14,16,23,24
зеварёфт/35
зоира/33
золим/852,4,7,29,859,853,31,627,633,14,742,752,15
зону/25,27,29,859,14,846,18,23
идора/25,34,3,7,8,155,9,29,859,14,16
истез/35,41,15
кӯҳна/4,5,6,7,8,9,223,29,859,14,846,742,752,16
кӯтоҳ/852,64,70,75,2,4,7,29,859,345,344,853,402,855,14,742,751,752,15
кӯча/25,3,4,6,8,9,223,29,859,14,16
камос/35,44
кан/852,1,2,839,4,104,842,10,859,474,649,655
карруби/30
клуб/25,3,859,855
коно/9,18
кост/852,35,43,45,46,47,2,94,7,859,344,345,855,862
кушо/852,9,10,11,326,474,475,502,862,17,18,20,831,833,849
латхӯрд/35,43,45
лиқо/859,14,23,24
майда/32,25,7,9,223,29,859,14,742,752,16,822,825,827
малоик/25,35,36,40,859,14
марҷон/25,35,37,58,63,29,859,14
маслиҳат/25,852,2,6,7,8,229,232,237,255,254,29,859,855,853,14,15,786,810,813
медошт/852,35,39,43,2,4,858,10,11,862,15
мекард/852,35,39,43,48,49,2,91,4,94,858,7,10,11,12,859,853,862,15
мехонд/852,35,43,2,4,842,94,10,11,862,15
мижгон/25,35,36,37,2,5,7,859,14,15
моҳидор/852,7,855,853,31
мони/25,9,231,29,859,846,16,21
муҳаббат/25,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,147,254,29,859,569,584,585,14,15,777
мусиқи/25,2,7,8,9,29,859,554,14,846,813,16,18,19
навишт/852,35,36,38,39,43,58,2,91,94,95,97,4,124,5,8,29,10,11,859,687,684,14,15
надошт/852,35,45,49,2,91,94,4,10,11,15
намегӯ/852,10,11,859,17,18,20
наменамо/10,11,17,18,20
нана/2
нарх/25,7,8,29,859,855,580,14,15
натоб/852,1,2,4,366
нафт/852,7,237,859,855,14,15,813
нишаст/25,852,35,36,39,43,45,49,2,91,94,95,99,100,101,102,4,858,7,8,254,255,258,29,10,11,859,853,14,15
ноҷоя/14
омез/35,1,58,2,4,104,274,10,859,474,475,502
пайваст/25,852,35,36,43,45,46,47,49,58,2,94,97,4,5,7,29,11,859,15
парвар/852,1,2,4,104,7,11,859,366,369,382,855,474,475,496,497,498,651,655,31,661,669,15
парвиз/33,859,14,15
паризад/35,42
пизишк/852,4,29,11,859,862,853,855,31,14,15
по/9,29,11,859,366,369,382,14,846,860,787,789,798,16,17,822,823,18,19,861,20,831,833,838,21,22,23,24
поччо/33,311,313,314,859,18,23,24
пурмӯҳтаво/29,859,16,22,23
раҳм/25,2,3,5,7,8,248,302,29,859,409,421,569,14,15
раҳматкард/35
рабуд/852,35,39,43,47,2,94,97,4,842,858,7,853,15
расад/25,2,5,224,254,29,859,14,15
ризо/852,9,223,311,859,855,856,853,539,540,547,14,846,16,20,21,23
сабӯҳизад/35,49
сарпанҷа/25,5,223,28,29,859
сарсабз/852,4,6,7,8,29,859,344,853,855,862,863,742,15
система/25,155,29,859,344,569,14,16
ситез/25,852,35,44,1,64,2,104,112,7,859,382,31,15
ситоишсаро/30
сухангӯ/852,9,30,859,344,862,855,853,846,16,18,831,21
табрикнома/25,859
табъ/25,2,3,857,94,5,6,7,8,29,859,855,14,15
тан/25,1,64,2,3,857,4,104,5,6,7,8,140,195,29,859,855,552,588,14,15
фармон/25,2,5,6,7,8,229,29,859,409,14,15
фатиламӯ/23
фунун/29,859,14,15
фурқат/33,852,2,5,7,859
хотир/25,35,36,40,58,2,3,857,5,6,7,8,29,859,552,699,707,711,14,15
шав/852,1,2,4,104,112,10,11,12,859,855,862,15
шикаст/25,852,35,36,42,43,49,58,2,91,94,95,97,4,842,858,5,133,7,29,11,859,862,14,15
шоир/25,852,82,2,4,858,5,7,8,195,29,11,859,853,862,855,863,580,31,627,14,742,751,15
шунид/25,852,35,36,39,43,48,49,2,3,94,95,97,4,103,132,843,7,10,11,859,15
эмгузар/31
